Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.020

Disclosure requirements—Department duties.

(1) In addition to any other requirements under federal or state law, a residential mortgage loan may not be made unless a disclosure summary of all material terms, as adopted by the department in subsection (2) of this section, is placed on a separate sheet of paper and has been provided by a financial institution to the borrower within three business days following receipt of a loan application. If any material terms of the residential mortgage loan change before closing, a new disclosure summary must be provided to the borrower within three days of any such change or at least three days before closing, whichever is earlier.

(2) The department shall adopt, by rule, a disclosure summary form with a content and format containing simple, plain-language terms that are reasonably understandable to the average person without the aid of third-party resources and shall include, but not be limited to, the following items: Fees and discount points on the loan; interest rates of the loan; broker fees; the broker's yield spread premium as a dollar amount; whether the loan contains prepayment penalties; whether the loan contains a balloon payment; whether the property taxes and property insurance are escrowed; whether the loan payments will adjust at the fully indexed rates; and whether there is a price added or premium charged because the loan is based on reduced documentation.

(3) The director may, at his or her discretion, require by rule other information relating to a residential mortgage loan to be included in the disclosure summary if the director determines that it is necessary to protect consumers. The director may adopt rules creating a standard form of disclosure summary to be used as a guide by financial institutions in fulfilling the requirements of this section.

(4) Disclosure in compliance with the real estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601, and Regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, as it exists on June 7, 2012, shall be deemed to comply with the disclosure requirements of this section. If needed, the director may adopt rules to implement and incorporate other changes in the disclosure summary as necessary due to federal law.

[ 2012 c 17 s 18; 2008 c 108 s 3.]